src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
hičoi+Ad-A:hičoi ADA_  "aivan" ;
Pedrunpiän+Adv:Pedrun#piän ADV-TEMP_  "Apostolien Pietarin ja Paavalin muistojuhlana" ;
aiganah+Adv:aiganah ADV-TEMP_  "aikanaan" ;
aigassah+Adv:aigassah ADV-TEMP_  "aikansa" ;
aigažeh+Adv:aigažeh ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisin" ;
aijahkoh+Adv:aijahkoh ADV-TEMP_  "hyvin varhain" ;
aijalleh+Adv:aijalleh ADV-TEMP_  "ajallaan" ;
aijanaijal+Adv:aijanaijal ADV-TEMP_  "ajoissa" ;
aijaskoh+Adv:aijahkoh ADV-TEMP_  "liian aikaisin" ;
aijei+Adv:aijei ADV-TEMP_  "(yougi:) aikaisin" ;
aijei% huandeksel+Adv:aijei% huandeksel ADV-TEMP_  "(yougi:) varhain aamulla" ;
aijeihkoh+Adv:aijeihkoh ADV-TEMP_  "liian aikaisin" ;
aijeihkoh+Adv:aijeihkoh ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisin" ;
aijessah+Adv:aijessah ADV-TEMP_  "(yougi:) hyvissä ajoin" ;
aijoi+Adv:aijoi ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisin" ;
aijoinaigah+Adv:aijoinaigah ADV_  "ajoissa" ;
aijoitellen+Adv:aijoitellen ADV-TEMP_  "ajoittain" ;
aijoittavah+Adv:aijoittavah ADV-TEMP_  "hyvin varhain" ;
ainos+Adv:ainos ADV-TEMP_  "aina" ;
ainoz+Adv:ainoz ADV-TEMP_  "aina" ;
aivoin+Adv:aivoin ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisin" ;
aivokkazeh+Adv:aivokkazeh ADV-TEMP_  "anivarhain" ;
alakulmis+Adv:alakulmis ADV_  "alta kulmain" ;
alallizesti+Adv:alallizesti ADV-TEMP_  "jatkuvasti" ;
alguudah+Adv:alguudah ADV-TEMP_  "alun alkaenkaan" ;
ammui+Adv:ammui ADV-TEMP_  "kauan sitten" ;
ammussah+Adv:ammussah ADV-TEMP_  "vanhastaan" ;
ammužes% aijassah+Adv:ammužes% aijassah ADV-TEMP_  "muinaisista ajoista asti" ;
ammužis% ajois+Adv:ammužis% ajois ADV-TEMP_  "ammoisista ajoista" ;
andiekse+Adv:andiekse ADV_  "anteeksi" ;
aniharvah+Adv:aniharvah ADV-TEMP_  "aniharvoin" ;
auttamattomasti+Adv:auttamattomasti ADV_  "auttamattomasti" ;
avuandupiän+Adv:avuandu#piän ADV-TEMP_  "avauspäivänä" ;
bokači+Adv:bokači ADV_  "sivuitse" ;
ebäselvästi+Adv:ebäselvästi ADV_  "epäselvästi" ;
egläi+Adv:egläi ADV-TEMP_  "eilen" ;
ehtäl+Adv:ehtäl ADV-TEMP_  "illalla" ;
ei% ammui+Adv:ei% ammui ADV-TEMP_  "äskettäin" ;
ei% jugei+Adv:ei% jugei ADV_  "helposti" ;
ei% viikokši+Adv:ei% viikokši ADV-TEMP_  "vähäksi aikaa" ;
eläissäh+Adv:eläissäh ADV-TEMP_  "eläissään" ;
elävästi+Adv:elävästi ADV_  "elävästi" ;
endižessäh+Adv:endižessäh ADV-TEMP_  "vieläkin" ;
enne+Adv:enne ADV-TEMP_  "ennen" ;
enneeglästy+Adv:enne#eglästy ADV-TEMP_  "toissapäivänä" ;
ennem+Adv:ennem ADV-TEMP_  "ennen" ;
ennem% aigua+Adv:ennem% aigua ADV-TEMP_  "ennenaikaisesti" ;
ennemullostu+Adv:enne#mullostu ADV-TEMP_  "toissavuonna" ;
ennepäi+Adv:ennepäi ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisemmin" ;
ennettäväh+Adv:ennettäväh ADV-TEMP_  "vähän ennen" ;
ennevahnas+Adv:enne#vahnas ADV-TEMP_  "muinoin" ;
ennevanhas+Adv:ennevanhas ADV-TEMP_  "ennenvanhaan" ;
enzikerran+Adv:enzikerran ADV-TEMP_  "ensimmäisen kerran" ;
enzimäi+Adv:enzimäi ADV_  "ensin" ;
erähiči+Adv:erähiči ADV-TEMP_  "kerran" ;
erähässypiän+Adv:erähässypiän ADV-TEMP_  "eräänä päivänä" ;
eräčihi+Adv:eräčihi ADV-TEMP_  "kerran" ;
ezimerkikse+Adv:ezimerkikse ADV_  "esimerkiksi" ;
hajamielizesti+Adv:hajamielizesti ADV_  "hajamielisesti" ;
harvah+Adv:harvah ADV-TEMP_  "harvoin" ;
harvembi+Adv:harvembi ADV-TEMP_  "harvemmin" ;
helläh+Adv:helläh ADV_  "hellästi" ;
hiivien+Adv:hiivien ADV_  "salavihkaa" ;
hillakažih+Adv:hilläkažih ADV-TEMP_  "pikkuhiljaa" ;
hillakkažih+Adv:hilläkkažih ADV-TEMP_  "pikkuhiljaa" ;
hilläkkäžih+Adv:hilläkkäžih ADV-TEMP_  "pikkuhiljaa" ;
hilläžeh+Adv:hilläžeh ADV-TEMP_  "hitaasti" ;
huavoluguh+Adv:huavoluguh ADV_  "säkeittäin" ;
huomei+Adv:huomei ADV-TEMP_  "huomenna" ;
huomenekse+Adv:huomenekse ADV-TEMP_  "huomiseksi" ;
huomenjälgeh+Adv:huomenjälgeh ADV-TEMP_  "ylihuomenna" ;
huondeksel+Adv:huondeksel ADV-TEMP_  "aamulla" ;
huonoh+Adv:huonoh ADV_  "huonosti" ;
hyväžil+Adv:hyväžil ADV_  "sovussa" ;
hätkembi+Adv:hätkembi ADV-TEMP_  "kauemmin" ;
hätkembän+Adv:hätkembän ADV-TEMP_  "kauemmin" ;
hätken+Adv:hätken ADV-TEMP_  "kauan" ;
iel+Adv:iel ADV-TEMP_  "ennen" ;
ieleglästy+Adv:ieleglästy ADV-TEMP_  "toissapäivänä" ;
iellettäväh+Adv:iellettäväh ADV_  "melko kauas" ;
illal+Adv:illal ADV-TEMP_  "illlalla" ;
ilmai+Adv:ilmai ADV_  "ilman" ;
innottomasti+Adv:innottomasti ADV_  "innottomasti" ;
ičentiijottomasti+Adv:ičentiijottomasti ADV_  "itsetiedottomasti" ;
jo+Adv:jo ADV-TEMP_  "jo" ;
joga% minuutal+Adv:joga% minuutal ADV-TEMP_  "alituiseen" ;
joga% puolepäi+Adv:joga% puolepäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ALL  "kaikkialle" ;
jugiesti+Adv:jugiesti ADV_  "raskaasti" ;
jyttyöh+Adv:jyttyöh ADV_  "samalla tavalla" ;
järilleh+Adv:järilleh ADV_  "takaisin" ;
kaikis+Adv:kaikis ADV_  "kaikkein" ;
kaikkiel+Adv:kaikkiel ADV-SPAT-IS-ADE  "kaikkialla" ;
kaikkiele+Adv:kaikkiele ADV-SPAT-IS-ALL  "kaikkialle" ;
kaikkielpäi+Adv:kaikkielpäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL  "kaikkialta" ;
kaksitellen+Adv:kaksitellen ADV_  "kaksitellen" ;
kačos+Adv:kačos ADV_  "katsos" ;
keskel+Adv:keskel ADV_  "keskellä" ;
kiihkiesti+Adv:kiihkiesti ADV_  "kiihkeästi" ;
kikalleh+Adv:kikalleh ADV_  "vinoon" ;
kogonah+Adv:kogonah ADV_  "kokonaan" ;
kolmanpiän+Adv:kolman#piän ADV-TEMP_  "keskiviikkona" ;
komakasti+Adv:komakasti ADV_  "loistavasti" ;
kovah+Adv:kovah ADV_  "kovasti" ;
kui+Adv:kui ADV-INTERR-MANNER  "kuinka" ;
kummakkahasti+Adv:kummakkahasti ADV_  "hassusti" ;
kurjasti+Adv:kurjasti ADV_  "kurjasti" ;
kusbo+Adv:kusbo ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-INE  "missä" ;
kuspäi+Adv:kuspäi ADV-INTERR-SPAT-IS-ELA  "mistä" ;
käzikkäi+Adv:käzikkäi ADV_  "käsi kädessä" ;
lembiesti+Adv:lembiesti ADV_  "lempeästi" ;
levälleh+Adv:levälleh ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3  "levälleen" ;
loitombakse+Adv:loitombakse ADV_  "kauemmaksi" ;
lujasti+Adv:lujasti ADV_  "lujasti" ;
lähil+Adv:lähil ADV_  "lähellä" ;
mahalleh+Adv:mahalleh ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3  "mahallaan" ;
mahalleh+Adv:mahalleh ADV_  "mahalleen" ;
mielettömästi+Adv:mielettömästi ADV_  "mielettömästi" ;
moitittavasti+Adv:moitittavasti ADV_  "moitittavasti" ;
mugazesti+Adv:mugazesti ADV_  "mukaisesti" ;
muuzikuallizesti+Adv:muuzikuallizesti ADV_  "musikaalisesti" ;
myöte+Adv:myöte ADV_  "myöten" ;
möllälleh+Adv:möllälleh ADV-IS-ELA-WITH-PXSG3  "silmistä: muljallaan" ;
nelläi% keskel+Adv:nelläi% keskel ADV_  "neljästään" ;
nellänpiän+Adv:nellän#piän ADV-TEMP_  "torstaina" ;
nikui+Adv:ni«kui ADV_  "kuinkaan" ;
nägymättömästi+Adv:nägymättömästi ADV_  "näkymättömästi" ;
oigienmugazesti+Adv:oigienmugazesti ADV_  "oikeudenmukaisesti" ;
ounahasti+Adv:ounahasti ADV_  "viekkaasti" ;
palavasti+Adv:palavasti ADV_  "palavasti" ;
pehmeisydämellizesti+Adv:pehmeisydämellizesti ADV_  "hyväsydämisesti" ;
peräh+Adv:peräh ADV_  "perässä" ;
pikoikodvažin+Adv:pikoikodvažin ADV_  "silloin tällöin" ;
puaksuh+Adv:puaksuh ADV_  "usein" ;
puaksužeh+Adv:puaksužeh QNT-ITER  "usein" ;
pyhänpiän+Adv:pyhän#piän ADV-TEMP_  "sunnuntaina" ;
rauhallizesti+Adv:rauhallizesti ADV_  "rauhallisesti" ;
ruadi+Adv:ruadi ADV_  "tähden" ;
selälleh+Adv:selälleh ADV_  "selälleen" ;
sie+Adv:sie ADV-SPAT  "siellä" ;
siel+Adv:siel ADV-SPAT  "siellä" ;
siepäi+Adv:siepäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL  "sieltä" ;
sil% aigah+Adv:sil% aigah ADV-TEMP_  "sillä aikaa" ;
silminnähten+Adv:silminnähten ADV-MANNER  "silminnähden" ;
silmän% räpähykses+Adv:silmän% räpähykses ADV_  "silmänräpäyksessä" ;
sinnypiän+Adv:sinny#piän ADV-TEMP_  "sinä päivänä" ;
sit+Adv:sit ADV-TEMP_  "sitten" ;
sumbah+Adv:sumbah ADV_  "tiiviisti" ;
tahtol+Adv:tahtol ADV_  "mielisuosiolla" ;
tiettävästi+Adv:tiettävästi ADV_  "tiettävästi" ;
tossupiän+Adv:tossu#piän ADV-TEMP_  "toissapäivänä" ;
tuan+Adv:tuan ADV_  "takana" ;
tuolpäi+Adv:tuolpäi ADV-SPAT-IS-ABL  "tuolta" ;
tuos+Adv:tuos ADV_  "tuossa" ;
tänäpiän+Adv:tänä#piän ADV-TEMP_  "tänään" ;
tässäh+Adv:tässäh ADV_  "tähän" ;
uudeh% luaduh+Adv:uudeh% luaduh ADV_  "uudella tavalla" ;
uvvessah+Adv:uvvessah ADV-TEMP_  "uudestaan" ;
vaivažesti+Adv:vaivažesti ADV-MANNER  "vaivaisesti" ;
varattavasti+Adv:varattavasti ADV_  "pelottavasti" ;
vedriesti+Adv:vedriesti ADV_  "nopeasti" ;
vilʼčah+Adv:vilʼčah ADV_  "vinoon" ;
vähem+Adv:vähem ADV_  "vähemmän" ;
vältävästi+Adv:vältävästi ADV_  "kuta kuinkin" ;
yksielpäi+Adv:yksielpäi ADV_  "yhtäältä" ;
ylähänpäi+Adv:ylähänpäi ADV_  "ylhäältä" ;
čuassuluguh+Adv:čuassuluguh ADV_  "tuntitolkulla" ;
